Mississippi, session 2026, SB2069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  (a)  Each public school district, public charter school and agricultural high school, the Mississippi Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, the Mississippi School of the Arts, and the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science shall, no later than January 1, 2027, adopt and send to the State Department of Education a specific policy banning the possession, or restricting the use, of cell phones by students during class or while under the supervision and control of a school employee.  The State Department of Education shall retain a copy of the policy on file. (b)  If a school or school district fails to adopt and transmit a policy as required in this subsection, the State Department of Education shall deduct one (1) day's worth of the school's or district's funds under the total funding formula for each day after January 1, 2027, that the school or district is noncompliant. (2)  In developing and adopting a policy under this section, a school or district may include exceptions to allow a student to possess or use a cell phone under any of the following circumstances: (a)  In the case of an emergency, or in response to a perceived threat of danger; (b)  When a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician or surgeon determines that the possession or use of a cell phone is medically necessary for the health or well-being of the student; or (c)  When the possession or use of a cell phone is required in a student's individualized education program. (3)  Students may be suspended or expelled from attendance at school for sufficient cause; however, in no case may sufficient cause for suspension or expulsion consist of only a violation of the cell phone possession and use policy developed and implemented under this section, except that suspension may be used as a disciplinary measure of last resort. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.